Missouri, session 2026, SB1143.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 197.315, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 197.315,
to read as follows:
197.315. 1. Any person who proposes to develop or
offer a new institutional health service within the state
must obtain a certificate of need from the committee prior
to the time such services are offered.
2. Only those new institutional health services which
are found by the committee to be needed shall be granted a
certificate of need. Only those new institutional health
services which are granted certificates of need shall be
offered or developed within the state. No expenditures for
new institutional health services in excess of the
applicable expenditure minimum shall be made by any person
unless a certificate of need has been granted.
3. After October 1, 1980, no state agency charged by
statute to license or certify health care facilities shall
issue a license to or certify any such facility, or distinct
part of such facility, that is developed without obtaining a
certificate of need.

SB 1143 2
4. If any person proposes to develop any new
institutional health care service without a certificate of
need as required by sections 197.300 to 197.366, the
committee shall notify the attorney general, and he shall
apply for an injunction or other appropriate legal action in
any court of this state against that person.
5. After October 1, 1980, no agency of state
government may appropriate or grant funds to or make payment
of any funds to any person or health care facility which has
not first obtained every certificate of need required
pursuant to sections 197.300 to 197.366.
6. A certificate of need shall be issued only for the
premises and persons named in the application and is not
transferable except by consent of the committee.
7. Project cost increases, due to changes in the
project application as approved or due to project change
orders, exceeding the initial estimate by more than ten
percent shall not be incurred without consent of the
committee.
8. Periodic reports to the committee shall be required
of any applicant who has been granted a certificate of need
until the project has been completed. The committee may
order the forfeiture of the certificate of need upon failure
of the applicant to file any such report.
9. A certificate of need shall be subject to
forfeiture for failure to incur a capital expenditure on any
approved project within six months after the date of the
order. The applicant may request an extension from the
committee of not more than six additional months based upon
substantial expenditure made.
10. Each application for a certificate of need must be
accompanied by an application fee. The time of filing

SB 1143 3
commences with the receipt of the application and the
application fee. The application fee is one thousand
dollars, or one-tenth of one percent of the total cost of
the proposed project, whichever is greater. All application
fees shall be deposited in the state treasury. Because of
the loss of federal funds, the general assembly will
appropriate funds to the Missouri health facilities review
committee.
11. In determining whether a certificate of need
should be granted, no consideration shall be given to the
facilities or equipment of any other health care facility
located more than a fifteen-mile radius from the applying
facility.
12. When a nursing facility shifts from a skilled to
an intermediate level of nursing care, it may return to the
higher level of care if it meets the licensure requirements,
without obtaining a certificate of need.
13. In no event shall a certificate of need be denied
because the applicant refuses to provide abortion services
or information.
14. A certificate of need shall not be required for
the transfer of ownership of an existing and operational
health facility in its entirety, except for any assisted
living facility, intermediate care facility, residential
care facility, or skilled nursing facility, as such terms
are defined in section 198.006.
15. A certificate of need may be granted to a facility
for an expansion, an addition of services, a new
institutional service, or for a new hospital facility which
provides for something less than that which was sought in
the application.

SB 1143 4
16. The provisions of this section shall not apply to
facilities operated by the state, and appropriation of funds
to such facilities by the general assembly shall be deemed
in compliance with this section, and such facilities shall
be deemed to have received an appropriate certificate of
need without payment of any fee or charge. The provisions
of this subsection shall not apply to hospitals operated by
the state and licensed under this chapter, except for
department of mental health state-operated psychiatric
hospitals.
17. Notwithstanding other provisions of this section,
a certificate of need may be issued after July 1, 1983, for
an intermediate care facility operated exclusively for the
intellectually disabled.
18. To assure the safe, appropriate, and cost-
effective transfer of new medical technology throughout the
state, a certificate of need shall not be required for the
purchase and operation of:
(1) Research equipment that is to be used in a
100 clinical trial that has received written approval from a
101 duly constituted institutional review board of an accredited
102 school of medicine or osteopathy located in Missouri to
103 establish its safety and efficacy and does not increase the
104 bed complement of the institution in which the equipment is
105 to be located. After the clinical trial has been completed,
106 a certificate of need must be obtained for continued use in
107 such facility; or
108 (2) Equipment that is to be used by an academic health
109 center operated by the state in furtherance of its research
110 or teaching missions.
✓